<?xml-model href="https://raw.githubusercontent.com/TEIC/TEI-Simple/master/teisimple.rng" type="application/xml" schematypens="http://relaxng.org/ns/structure/1.0"?><TEI xmlns="http://www.tei-c.org/ns/1.0"><teiHeader><titleStmt><title>The Project Gutenberg EBook of Marriage, by H. G.
      Wells</title><author>Wells, Herbert George (1866-1946)</author></titleStmt><publicationStmt><publisher>COST Action "Distant Reading for European Literary History" (CA16204)</publisher><date>1912</date></publicationStmt></teiHeader><text><body><div type="chapter" n="12">
CHAPTER THE FOURTH
Lonely Hut

Marjorie and Trafford walked slowly back to the
       hut. "There is much to do before the weather breaks," he said, ending a
      thoughtful silence. "Then we can sit inside there and talk about the things we need to talk
      about."
He added awkwardly: "Since we started, there has been so much to hold the attention. I
      remember a mood—an immense despair. I feel it's still somewhere at the back of things, waiting
      to be dealt with. It's our essential fact. But meanwhile we've been busy, looking at fresh
      things."
He paused. "Now it will be different perhaps...."
For nearly four weeks indeed they were occupied very closely, and crept into their bunks at
      night as tired as wholesome animals who drop to sleep. At any time the weather might break;
      already there had been two overcast days and a frowning conference of clouds in the north.
      When at last storms began they knew there would be nothing for it but to keep in the hut until
      the world froze up.
There was much to do to the hut. The absence of anything but stunted and impoverished timber
      and the limitation of time, had forbidden a log hut, and their home was really only a double
      framework, rammed tight between inner and outer frame with a mixture of earth and boughs and
      twigs of willow, pine and balsam. The floor was hammered earth carpeted with balsam twigs and
      a caribou skin. Outside and within wall and roof were faced with coarse canvas—that
       was Trafford's idea—and their bunks occupied two sides of the hut. Heating was
      done by the sheet-iron stove they had brought with them, and the smoke was carried out to the
      roof by a thin sheet-iron pipe which had come up outside a roll of canvas. They had made the
      roof with about the pitch of a Swiss châlet, and it was covered with nailed waterproof canvas,
      held down by a large number of big lumps of stone. Much of the canvassing still remained to do
      when the men went down, and then the Traffords used every scrap of packing-paper and newspaper
      that had come up with them and was not needed for lining the bunks in covering any crack or
      join in the canvas wall.
Two decadent luxuries, a rubber bath and two rubber hot-water bottles, hung behind the door.
      They were almost the only luxuries. Kettles and pans and some provisions stood on a shelf over
      the stove; there was also a sort of recess cupboard in the opposite corner, reserve clothes
      were in canvas trunks under the bunks, they kept their immediate supply of wood under the
      eaves just outside the door, and there was a big can of water between stove and door. When the
      winter came they would have to bring in ice from the stream.
This was their home. The tent that had sheltered Marjorie on the way up was erected close to
      this hut to serve as a rude scullery and outhouse, and they also made a long, roughly thatched
      roof with a canvas cover, supported on stakes, to shelter the rest of the stores. The stuff in
      tins and cases and jars they left on the ground under this; the rest—the flour, candles,
      bacon, dried caribou beef, and so forth, they hung, as they hoped, out of the reach of any
      prowling beast. And finally and most important was the wood pile. This they accumulated to the
      north and east
       of the hut, and all day long with a sort of ant-like perseverance Trafford added
      to it from the thickets below. Once or twice, however, tempted by the appearance of birds, he
      went shooting, and one day he got five geese that they spent a day upon, plucking, cleaning,
      boiling and putting up in all their store of empty cans, letting the fat float and solidify on
      the top to preserve this addition to their provision until the advent of the frost rendered
      all other preservatives unnecessary. They also tried to catch trout down in the river below,
      but though they saw many fish the catch was less than a dozen.
It was a discovery to both of them to find how companionable these occupations were, how
      much more side by side they could be amateurishly cleaning out a goose and disputing about its
      cooking, than they had ever contrived to be in Sussex Square.
"These things are so infernally interesting," said Trafford, surveying the row of
      miscellaneous cans upon the stove he had packed with disarticulated goose. "But we didn't come
      here to picnic. All this is eating us up. I have a memory of some immense tragic
      purpose——"
"That tin's boiling!" screamed Marjorie sharply.
He resumed his thread after an active interlude.
"We'll keep the wolf from the door," he said.
"Don't talk of wolves!" said Marjorie.
"It is only when men have driven away the wolf from the door—oh! altogether away, that they
      find despair in the sky? I wonder——"
"What?" asked Marjorie in his pause.
"I wonder if there is nothing really in life but this, the food hunt and the love hunt. Is
      life just all hunger and need, and are we left with nothing—nothing at all—when these things
      are done?... We're infernally uncomfortable here."
      
"Oh, nonsense!" cried Marjorie.
"Think of your carpets at home! Think of the great, warm, beautiful house that wasn't big
      enough!—And yet here, we're happy."
"We are happy," said Marjorie, struck by the thought. "Only——"
"Yes."
"I'm afraid. And I long for the children. And the wind nips."
"It may be those are good things for us. No! This is just a lark as yet, Marjorie. It's
      still fresh and full of distractions. The discomforts are amusing. Presently we'll get used to
      it. Then we'll talk out—what we have to talk out.... I say, wouldn't it keep and improve this
      goose of ours if we put in a little brandy?"

The weather broke at last. One might say it smashed itself over their heads. There came an
      afternoon darkness swift and sudden, a wild gale and an icy sleet that gave place in the night
      to snow, so that Trafford looked out next morning to see a maddening chaos of small white
      flakes, incredibly swift, against something that was neither darkness nor light. Even with the
      door but partly ajar a cruelty of cold put its claw within, set everything that was moveable
      swaying and clattering, and made Marjorie hasten shuddering to heap fresh logs upon the fire.
      Once or twice Trafford went out to inspect tent and roof and store-shed, several times wrapped
      to the nose he battled his way for fresh wood, and for the rest of the blizzard they kept to
      the hut. It was slumberously stuffy, but comfortingly full of flavours of tobacco and food.
      There were two days of intermission and
       a day of gusts and icy sleet again, turning with one extraordinary clap of
      thunder to a wild downpour of dancing lumps of ice, and then a night when it seemed all
      Labrador, earth and sky together, was in hysterical protest against inconceivable wrongs.
And then the break was over; the annual freezing-up was accomplished, winter had established
      itself, the snowfall moderated and ceased, and an ice-bound world shone white and sunlit under
      a cloudless sky.

Through all that time they got no further with the great discussion for which they had faced
      that solitude. They attempted beginnings.
"Where had we got to when we left England?" cried Marjorie. "You couldn't work, you couldn't
      rest—you hated our life."
"Yes, I know. I had a violent hatred of the lives we were leading. I thought—we had to get
      away. To think.... But things don't leave us alone here."
He covered his face with his hands.
"Why did we come here?" he asked.
"You wanted—to get out of things."
"Yes. But with you.... Have we, after all, got out of things at all? I said coming up,
      perhaps we were leaving our own problem behind. In exchange for other problems—old problems
      men have had before. We've got nearer necessity; that's all. Things press on us just as much.
      There's nothing more fundamental in wild nature, nothing profounder—only something earlier.
      One doesn't get out of life by going here or there.... But I wanted to get you away—from all
      things that had such a hold on
       you....
"When one lies awake at nights, then one seems to get down into things...."
He went to the door, opened it, and stood looking out. Against a wan daylight the snow was
      falling noiselessly and steadily.
"Everything goes on," he said.... "Relentlessly...."

That was as far as they had got when the storms ceased and they came out again into an air
      inexpressibly fresh and sharp and sweet, and into a world blindingly clean and golden white
      under the rays of the morning sun.
"We will build a fire out here," said Marjorie; "make a great pile. There is no reason at
      all why we shouldn't live outside all through the day in such weather as this."

One morning Trafford found the footmarks of some catlike creature in the snow near the
      bushes where he was accustomed to get firewood; they led away very plainly up the hill, and
      after breakfast he took his knife and rifle and snowshoes and went after the lynx—for that he
      decided the animal must be. There was no urgent reason why he should want to kill a lynx,
      unless perhaps that killing it made the store shed a trifle safer; but it was the first trail
      of any living thing for many days; it promised excitement; some primordial instinct perhaps
      urged him.
The morning was a little overcast, and very cold between the gleams of wintry sunshine.
      "Good-bye, dear wife!" he said, and then as she remembered afterwards came back a dozen yards
      to kiss her.
       "I'll not be long," he said. "The beast's prowling, and if it doesn't get wind
      of me I ought to find it in an hour." He hesitated for a moment. "I'll not be long," he
      repeated, and she had an instant's wonder whether he hid from her the same dread of loneliness
      that she concealed. Or perhaps he only knew her secret. Up among the tumbled rocks he turned,
      and she was still watching him. "Good-bye!" he cried and waved, and the willow thickets closed
      about him.
She forced herself to the petty duties of the day, made up the fire from the pile he had
      left for her, set water to boil, put the hut in order, brought out sheets and blankets to air
      and set herself to wash up. She wished she had been able to go with him. The sky cleared
      presently, and the low December sun lit all the world about her, but it left her spirit
      desolate.
She did not expect him to return until mid-day, and she sat herself down on a log before the
      fire to darn a pair of socks as well as she could. For a time this unusual occupation held her
      attention and then her hands became slow and at last inactive, and she fell into reverie. She
      thought at first of her children and what they might be doing, in England across there to the
      east it would be about five hours later, four o'clock in the afternoon, and the children would
      be coming home through the warm muggy London sunshine with Fraulein Otto to tea. She wondered
      if they had the proper clothes, if they were well; were they perhaps quarrelling or being
      naughty or skylarking gaily across the Park. Of course Fraulein Otto was all right, quite to
      be trusted, absolutely trustworthy, and their grandmother would watch for a flushed face or an
      irrational petulance or any of the little signs that herald trouble with more than a mother's
      instinctive alertness. No need to worry
       about the children, no need whatever.... The world of London opened out behind
      these thoughts; it was so queer to think that she was in almost the same latitude as the busy
      bright traffic of the autumn season in Kensington Gore; that away there in ten thousand
      cleverly furnished drawing-rooms the ringing tea things were being set out for the rustling
      advent of smart callers and the quick leaping gossip. And there would be all sorts of cakes
      and little things; for a while her mind ran on cakes and little things, and she thought in
      particular whether it wasn't time to begin cooking.... Not yet. What was it she had been
      thinking about? Ah! the Solomonsons and the Capeses and the Bernards and the Carmels and the
      Lees. Would they talk of her and Trafford? It would be strange to go back to it all. Would
      they go back to it all? She found herself thinking intently of Trafford.
What a fine human being he was! And how touchingly human! The thoughts of his moments of
      irritation, his baffled silences, filled her with a wild passion of tenderness. She had
      disappointed him; all that life failed to satisfy him. Dear master of her life! what was it he
      needed? She too wasn't satisfied with life, but while she had been able to assuage herself
      with a perpetual series of petty excitements, theatres, new books and new people, meetings,
      movements, dinners, shows, he had grown to an immense discontent. He had most of the things
      men sought, wealth, respect, love, children.... So many men might have blunted their
      heart-ache with—adventures. There were pretty women, clever women, unoccupied women. She felt
      she wouldn't have minded—much—if it made him happy.... It was so wonderful he loved
      her still.... It wasn't that he lacked occupation; on the whole he overworked. His business
      interests were big and wide. Ought he to go into politics?
       Why was it that the researches that had held him once, could hold him now no
      more? That was the real pity of it. Was she to blame for that? She couldn't state a case
      against herself, and yet she felt she was to blame. She had taken him away from those things,
      forced him to make money....
She sat chin on hand staring into the fire, the sock forgotten on her knee.
She could not weigh justice between herself and him. If he was unhappy it was her fault. She
      knew if he was unhappy it was no excuse that she had not known, had been misled, had a right
      to her own instincts and purposes. She had got to make him happy. But what was she to do, what
      was there for her to do?...
Only he could work out his own salvation, and until he had light, all she could do was to
      stand by him, help him, cease to irritate him, watch, wait. Anyhow she could at least mend his
      socks as well as possible, so that the threads would not chafe him....
She flashed to her feet. What was that?
It seemed to her she had heard the sound of a shot, and a quick brief wake of echoes. She
      looked across the icy waste of the river, and then up the tangled slopes of the mountain. Her
      heart was beating very fast. It must have been up there, and no doubt he had killed his beast.
      Some shadow of doubt she would not admit crossed that obvious suggestion.
This wilderness was making her as nervously responsive as a creature of the wild.
Came a second shot; this time there was no doubt of it. Then the desolate silence closed
      about her again.
She stood for a long time staring at the shrubby
       slopes that rose to the barren rock wilderness of the purple mountain crest. She
      sighed deeply at last, and set herself to make up the fire and prepare for the mid-day meal.
      Once far away across the river she heard the howl of a wolf.
Time seemed to pass very slowly that day. She found herself going repeatedly to the space
      between the day tent and the sleeping hut from which she could see the stunted wood that had
      swallowed him up, and after what seemed a long hour her watch told her it was still only
      half-past twelve. And the fourth or fifth time that she went to look out she was set atremble
      again by the sound of a third shot. And then at regular intervals out of that distant brown
      purple jumble of thickets against the snow came two more shots. "Something has happened," she
      said, "something has happened," and stood rigid. Then she became active, seized the rifle that
      was always at hand when she was alone, fired into the sky and stood listening.
Prompt come an answering shot.
"He wants me," said Marjorie. "Something——Perhaps he has killed something too big to
      bring!"
She was for starting at once, and then remembered this was not the way of the
      wilderness.
She thought and moved very rapidly. Her mind catalogued possible requirements, rifle,
      hunting knife, the oilskin bag with matches, and some chunks of dry paper, the rucksack—and he
      would be hungry. She took a saucepan and a huge chunk of cheese and biscuit. Then a brandy
      flask is sometimes handy—one never knows. Though nothing was wrong, of course. Needles and
      stout thread, and some cord. Snowshoes. A waterproof cloak could be easily carried. Her light
      hatchet for wood. She cast about to see if there was anything else. She had almost
       forgotten cartridges—and a revolver. Nothing more. She kicked a stray brand or
      so into the fire, put on some more wood, damped the fire with an armful of snow to make it
      last longer, and set out towards the willows into which he had vanished.
There was a rustling and snapping of branches as she pushed her way through the bushes, a
      little stir that died insensibly into quiet again; and then the camping place became very
      still....
Scarcely a sound occurred, except for the little shuddering and stirring of the fire, and
      the reluctant, infrequent drip from the icicles along the sunny edge of the log hut roof.
      About one o'clock the amber sunshine faded out altogether, a veil of clouds thickened and
      became greyly ominous, and a little after two the first flakes of a snowstorm fell hissing
      into the fire. A wind rose and drove the multiplying snowflakes in whirls and eddies before
      it. The icicles ceased to drip, but one or two broke and fell with a weak tinkling. A deep
      soughing, a shuddering groaning of trees and shrubs, came ever and again out of the ravine,
      and the powdery snow blew like puffs of smoke from the branches.
By four the fire was out, and the snow was piling high in the darkling twilight against tent
      and hut....

Trafford's trail led Marjorie through the thicket of dwarf willows and down to the gully of
      the rivulet which they had called Marjorie Trickle; it had long since become a trough of
      snow-covered rotten ice; the trail crossed this and, turning sharply uphill, went on until it
      was clear of shrubs and trees, and in the windy open of the upper slopes it crossed a ridge
      and came over the lip of a large desolate valley with slopes
       of ice and icy snow. Here she spent some time in following his loops back on the
      homeward trail before she saw what was manifestly the final trail running far away out across
      the snow, with the spoor of the lynx, a lightly-dotted line, to the right of it. She followed
      this suggestion of the trail, put on her snowshoes, and shuffled her way across this valley,
      which opened as she proceeded. She hoped that over the ridge she would find Trafford, and
      scanned the sky for the faintest discolouration of a fire, but there was none. That seemed odd
      to her, but the wind was in her face, and perhaps it beat the smoke down. Then as her eyes
      scanned the hummocky ridge ahead, she saw something, something very intent and still, that
      brought her heart into her mouth. It was a big, grey wolf, standing with back haunched and
      head down, watching and winding something beyond there, out of sight.
Marjorie had an instinctive fear of wild animals, and it still seemed dreadful to her that
      they should go at large, uncaged. She suddenly wanted Trafford violently, wanted him by her
      side. Also she thought of leaving the trail, going back to the bushes. She had to take herself
      in hand. In the wastes one did not fear wild beasts. One had no fear of them. But why not fire
      a shot to let him know she was near?
The beast flashed round with an animal's instantaneous change of pose, and looked at her.
      For a couple of seconds, perhaps, woman and brute regarded one another across a quarter of a
      mile of snowy desolation.
Suppose it came towards her!
She would fire—and she would fire at it. She made a guess at the range and aimed very
      carefully. She saw the snow fly two yards ahead of the grisly shape, and then in an instant it
      had vanished over the
       crest.
She reloaded, and stood for a moment waiting for Trafford's answer. No answer came. "Queer!"
      she whispered, "queer!"—and suddenly such a horror of anticipation assailed her that she
      started running and floundering through the snow to escape it. Twice she called his name, and
      once she just stopped herself from firing a shot.
Over the ridge she would find him. Surely she would find him over the ridge.
She found herself among rocks, and there was a beaten and trampled place where Trafford must
      have waited and crouched. Then on and down a slope of tumbled boulders. There came a patch
      where he had either thrown himself down or fallen.
It seemed to her he must have been running....
Suddenly, a hundred feet or so away, she saw a patch of violently disturbed snow—snow
      stained a dreadful colour, a snow of scarlet crystals! Three strides and Trafford was in
      sight.
She had a swift conviction he was dead. He was lying in a crumpled attitude on a patch of
      snow between convergent rocks, and the lynx, a mass of blood smeared silvery fur, was in some
      way mixed up with him. She saw as she came nearer that the snow was disturbed round about
      them, and discoloured copiously, yellow widely, and in places bright red, with congealed and
      frozen blood. She felt no fear now, and no emotion; all her mind was engaged with the clear,
      bleak perception of the fact before her. She did not care to call to him again. His head was
      hidden by the lynx's body, it was as if he was burrowing underneath the creature; his legs
      were twisted about each other in a queer, unnatural attitude.
Then, as she dropped off a boulder, and came nearer, Trafford moved. A hand came out and
      gripped the rifle beside him; he suddenly lifted a
       dreadful face, horribly scarred and torn, and crimson with frozen blood; he
      pushed the grey beast aside, rose on an elbow, wiped his sleeve across his eyes, stared at
      her, grunted, and flopped forward. He had fainted.
She was now as clear-minded and as self-possessed as a woman in a shop. In another moment
      she was kneeling by his side. She saw, by the position of his knife and the huge rip in the
      beast's body, that he had stabbed the lynx to death as it clawed his head; he must have shot
      and wounded it and then fallen upon it. His knitted cap was torn to ribbons, and hung upon his
      neck. Also his leg was manifestly injured; how, she could not tell. It was chiefly evident he
      must freeze if he lay here. It seemed to her that perhaps he had pulled the dead brute over
      him to protect his torn skin from the extremity of cold. The lynx was already rigid, its
      clumsy paws asprawl—the torn skin and clot upon Trafford's face was stiff as she put her hands
      about his head to raise him. She turned him over on his back—how heavy he seemed!—and forced
      brandy between his teeth. Then, after a moment's hesitation, she poured a little brandy on his
      wounds.
She glanced at his leg, which was surely broken, and back at his face. Then she gave him
      more brandy and his eyelids flickered. He moved his hand weakly. "The blood," he said, "kept
      getting in my eyes."
She gave him brandy once again, wiped his face and glanced at his leg. Something ought to be
      done to that she thought. But things must be done in order.
She stared up at the darkling sky with its grey promise of snow, and down the slopes of the
      mountain. Clearly they must stay the night here. They were too high for wood among these
      rocks, but three
       or four hundred yards below there were a number of dwarfed fir trees. She had
      brought an axe, so that a fire was possible. Should she go back to camp and get the tent?
Trafford was trying to speak again. "I got——" he said.
"Yes?"
"Got my leg in that crack. Damn—damned nuisance."
Was he able to advise her? She looked at him, and then perceived she must bind up his head
      and face. She knelt behind him and raised his head on her knee. She had a thick silk neck
      muffler, and this she supplemented by a band she cut and tore from her inner vest. She bound
      this, still warm from her body, about him, wrapped her cloak round him. The next thing was a
      fire. Five yards away, perhaps, a great mass of purple gabbro hung over a patch of nearly
      snowless moss. A hummock to the westward offered shelter from the weakly bitter wind, the icy
      draught, that was soughing down the valley. Always in Labrador, if you can, you camp against a
      rock surface; it shelters you from the wind, reflects your fire, guards your back.
"Rag!" she said.
"Rotten hole," said Trafford.
"What?" she cried sharply.
"Got you in a rotten hole," he said. "Eh?"
"Listen," she said, and shook his shoulder. "Look! I want to get you up against that
      rock."
"Won't make much difference," said Trafford, and opened his eyes. "Where?" he asked.
"There."
He remained quite quiet for a second perhaps. "Listen to me," he said. "Go back to
      camp."
"Yes," she said.
      
"Go back to camp. Make a pack of all the strongest food—strenthin'—strengthrin' food—you
      know?" He seemed troubled to express himself.
"Yes," she said.
"Down the river. Down—down. Till you meet help."
"Leave you?"
He nodded his head and winced.
"You're always plucky," he said. "Look facts in the face. Kiddies. Thought it over while you
      were coming." A tear oozed from his eye. "Not be a fool, Madge. Kiss me good-bye. Not be a
      fool. I'm done. Kids."
She stared at him and her spirit was a luminous mist of tears. "You old coward,"
      she said in his ear, and kissed the little patch of rough and bloody cheek beneath his eye.
      Then she knelt up beside him. "I'm boss now, old man," she said. "I want to get you
      to that place there under the rock. If I drag, can you help?"
He answered obstinately: "You'd better go."
"I'll make you comfortable first," she answered, "anyhow."
He made an enormous effort, and then with her quick help and with his back to her knee, had
      raised himself on his elbows.
"And afterwards?" he asked.
"Build a fire."
"Wood?"
"Down there."
"Two bits of wood tied on my leg—splints. Then I can drag myself. See? Like a blessed old
      walrus."
He smiled, and she kissed his bandaged face again.
"Else it hurts," he apologized, "more than I can stand."
She stood up again, thought, put his rifle and
       knife to his hand for fear of that lurking wolf, abandoning her own rifle with
      an effort, and went striding and leaping from rock to rock towards the trees below. She made
      the chips fly, and was presently towing three venerable pine dwarfs, bumping over rock and
      crevice, back to Trafford. She flung them down, stood for a moment bright and breathless, then
      set herself to hack off the splints he needed from the biggest stem. "Now," she said, coming
      to him.
"A fool," he remarked, "would have made the splints down there. You're—good,
      Marjorie."
She lugged his leg out straight, put it into the natural and least painful pose, padded it
      with moss and her torn handkerchief, and bound it up. As she did so a handful of snowflakes
      came whirling about them. She was now braced up to every possibility. "It never rains," she
      said grimly, "but it pours," and went on with her bone-setting. He was badly weakened by pain
      and shock, and once he swore at her sharply. "Sorry," he said.
She rolled him over on his chest, and left him to struggle to the shelter of the rock while
      she went for more wood.
The sky alarmed her. The mountains up the valley were already hidden by driven rags of slaty
      snowstorms. This time she found a longer but easier path for dragging her boughs and trees;
      she determined she would not start the fire until nightfall, nor waste any time in preparing
      food until then. There were dead boughs for kindling—more than enough. It was snowing quite
      fast by the time she got up to him with her second load, and a premature twilight already
      obscured and exaggerated the rocks and mounds about her. She gave some of her cheese to
      Trafford, and gnawed some herself on her way down to the wood again. She regretted that she
      had
       brought neither candles nor lantern, because then she might have kept on until
      the cold of night stopped her, and she reproached herself bitterly because she had brought no
      tea. She could forgive herself the lantern, she had never expected to be out after dark, but
      the tea was inexcusable. She muttered self-reproaches while she worked like two men among the
      trees, panting puffs of mist that froze upon her lips and iced the knitted wool that covered
      her chin. Why don't they teach a girl to handle an axe?...
When at last the wolfish cold of the Labrador night had come, it found Trafford and Marjorie
      seated almost warmly on a bed of pine boughs between the sheltering dark rock behind and a big
      but well husbanded fire in front, drinking a queer-tasting but not unsavory soup of
      lynx-flesh, that she had fortified with the remainder of the brandy. Then they tried roast
      lynx and ate a little, and finished with some scraps of cheese and deep draughts of hot water.
      Then—oh Tyburnia and Chelsea and all that is becoming!—they smoked Trafford's pipe for
      alternate minutes, and Marjorie found great comfort in it.
The snowstorm poured incessantly out of the darkness to become flakes of burning fire in the
      light of the flames, flakes that vanished magically, but it only reached them and wetted them
      in occasional gusts. What did it matter for the moment if the dim snow-heaps rose and rose
      about them? A glorious fatigue, an immense self-satisfaction possessed Marjorie; she felt that
      they had both done well.
"I am not afraid of to-morrow now," she said at last—a thought matured. "No!"
Trafford had the pipe and did not speak for a moment. "Nor I," he said at last. "Very likely
      we'll get through with it." He added after a pause: "I thought I was done for. A man—loses
      heart.
       After a loss of blood."
"The leg's better?"
"Hot as fire." His humour hadn't left him. "It's a treat," he said. "The hottest thing in
      Labrador."
"I've been a good squaw this time, old man?" she asked suddenly.
He seemed not to hear her; then his lips twitched and he made a feeble movement for her
      hand. "I cursed you," he said....
She slept, but on a spring as it were, lest the fire should fall. She replenished it with
      boughs, tucked in the half-burnt logs, and went to sleep again. Then it seemed to her that
      some invisible hand was pouring a thin spirit on the flames that made them leap and crackle
      and spread north and south until they filled the heavens. Her eyes were open and the snowstorm
      overpast, leaving the sky clear, and all the westward heaven alight with the trailing,
      crackling, leaping curtains of the Aurora, brighter than she had ever seen them before. Quite
      clearly visible beyond the smoulder of the fire, a wintry waste of rock and snow, boulder
      beyond boulder, passed into a dun obscurity. The mountain to the right of them lay long and
      white and stiff, a shrouded death. All earth was dead and waste and nothing, and the sky alive
      and coldly marvellous, signalling and astir. She watched the changing, shifting colours, and
      they made her think of the gathering banners of inhuman hosts, the stir and marshalling of icy
      giants for ends stupendous and indifferent to all the trivial impertinence of man's
      existence....
That night the whole world of man seemed small and shallow and insecure to her, beyond
      comparison. One came, she thought, but just a little way out of its warm and sociable cities
      hither, and found this homeless wilderness; one pricked the thin appearances of
       life with microscope or telescope and came to an equal strangeness. All the
      pride and hope of human life goes to and fro in a little shell of air between this ancient
      globe of rusty nickel-steel and the void of space; faint specks we are within a film; we
      quiver between the atom and the infinite, being hardly more substantial than the glow within
      an oily skin that drifts upon the water. The wonder and the riddle of it! Here she and
      Trafford were! Phantasmal shapes of unsubstantial fluid thinly skinned against evaporation and
      wrapped about with woven wool and the skins of beasts, that yet reflected and perceived,
      suffered and sought to understand; that held a million memories, framed thoughts that plumbed
      the deeps of space and time,—and another day of snow or icy wind might leave them just
      scattered bones and torn rags gnawed by a famishing wolf!...
She felt a passionate desire to pray....
She glanced at Trafford beside her, and found him awake and staring. His face was very pale
      and strange in that livid, flickering light. She would have spoken, and then she saw his lips
      were moving, and something, something she did not understand, held her back from doing so.

The bleak, slow dawn found Marjorie intently busy. She had made up the fire, boiled water
      and washed and dressed Trafford's wounds, and made another soup of lynx. But Trafford had
      weakened in the night, the stuff nauseated him, he refused it and tried to smoke and was sick,
      and then sat back rather despairfully after a second attempt to persuade her to leave him
      there to die. This failure of his spirit distressed her and a little astonished her, but it
      only
       made her more resolute to go through with her work. She had awakened cold, stiff
      and weary, but her fatigue vanished with movement; she toiled for an hour replenishing her
      pile of fuel, made up the fire, put his gun ready to his hand, kissed him, abused him lovingly
      for the trouble he gave her until his poor torn face lit in response, and then parting on a
      note of cheerful confidence set out to return to the hut. She found the way not altogether
      easy to make out, wind and snow had left scarcely a trace of their tracks, and her mind was
      full of the stores she must bring and the possibility of moving him nearer to the hut. She was
      startled to see by the fresh, deep spoor along the ridge how near the wolf had dared approach
      them in the darkness....
Ever and again Marjorie had to halt and look back to get her direction right. As it was she
      came through the willow scrub nearly half a mile above the hut, and had to follow the steep
      bank of the frozen river down. At one place she nearly slipped upon an icy slope of rock.
One possibility she did not dare to think of during that time; a blizzard now would cut her
      off absolutely from any return to Trafford. Short of that she believed she could get
      through.
Her quick mind was full of all she had to do. At first she had thought chiefly of his
      immediate necessities, of food and some sort of shelter. She had got a list of things in her
      head—meat extract, bandages, corrosive sublimate by way of antiseptic, brandy, a tin of beef,
      some bread and so forth; she went over that several times to be sure of it, and then for a
      time she puzzled about a tent. She thought she could manage a bale of blankets on her back,
      and that she could rig a sleeping tent for herself and Trafford with one and some bent sticks.
      The big tent would be too
       much to strike and shift. And then her mind went on to a bolder enterprise,
      which was to get him home. The nearer she could bring him to the log hut, the nearer they
      would be to supplies. She cast about for some sort of sledge. The snow was too soft and broken
      for runners, especially among the trees, but if she could get a flat of smooth wood she
      thought she might be able to drag him. She decided to try the side of her bunk. She could
      easily get that off. She would have, of course, to run it edgewise through the thickets and
      across the ravine, but after that she would have almost clear going until she reached the
      steep place of broken rocks within two hundred yards of him. The idea of a sledge grew upon
      her, and she planned to nail a rope along the edge and make a kind of harness for herself.
She found the camping-place piled high with drifted snow, which had invaded tent and hut,
      and that some beast, a wolverine she guessed, had been into the hut, devoured every candle-end
      and the uppers of Trafford's well-greased second boots, and had then gone to the corner of the
      store shed and clambered up to the stores. She made no account of its depredations there, but
      set herself to make a sledge and get her supplies together. There was a gleam of sunshine, but
      she did not like the look of the sky, and she was horribly afraid of what might be happening
      to Trafford. She carried her stuff through the wood and across the ravine, and returned for
      her improvised sledge. She was still struggling with that among the trees when it began to
      snow again.
It was hard then not to be frantic in her efforts. As it was, she packed her stuff so
      loosely on the planking that she had to repack it, and she started without putting on her
      snowshoes, and floundered fifty yards before she discovered that omission. The snow was
       now falling fast, darkling the sky and hiding everything but objects close at
      hand, and she had to use all her wits to determine her direction; she knew she must go down a
      long slope and then up to the ridge, and it came to her as a happy inspiration that if she
      bore to the left she might strike some recognizable vestige of her morning's trail. She had
      read of people walking in circles when they have no light or guidance, and that troubled her
      until she bethought herself of the little compass on her watch chain. By that she kept her
      direction. She wished very much she had timed herself across the waste, so that she could tell
      when she approached the ridge.
Soon her back and shoulders were aching violently, and the rope across her chest was tugging
      like some evil-tempered thing. But she did not dare to rest. The snow was now falling thick
      and fast, the flakes traced white spirals and made her head spin, so that she was constantly
      falling away to the south-westward and then correcting herself by the compass. She tried to
      think how this zig-zagging might affect her course, but the snow whirls confused her mind and
      a growing anxiety would not let her pause to think. She felt blinded; it seemed to be snowing
      inside her eyes so that she wanted to rub them. Soon the ground must rise to the ridge, she
      told herself; it must surely rise. Then the sledge came bumping at her heels and she perceived
      she was going down hill. She consulted the compass, and she found she was facing south. She
      turned sharply to the right again. The snowfall became a noiseless, pitiless torture to sight
      and mind.
The sledge behind her struggled to hold her back, and the snow balled under her snowshoes.
      She wanted to stop and rest, take thought, sit for a moment. She struggled with herself and
      kept on. She tried walking
       with shut eyes, and tripped and came near sprawling. "Oh God!" she cried, "oh
      God!" too stupefied for more articulate prayers.
Would the rise of the ground to the ribs of rock never come?
A figure, black and erect, stood in front of her suddenly, and beyond appeared a group of
      black, straight antagonists. She staggered on towards them, gripping her rifle with some
      muddled idea of defence, and in another moment she was brushing against the branches of a
      stunted fir, which shed thick lumps of snow upon her feet. What trees were these? Had she ever
      passed any trees? No! There were no trees on her way to Trafford....
She began whimpering like a tormented child. But even as she wept she turned her sledge
      about to follow the edge of the wood. She was too much downhill, she thought and she must bear
      up again.
She left the trees behind, made an angle uphill to the right, and was presently among trees
      again. Again she left them and again came back to them. She screamed with anger at them and
      twitched her sledge away. She wiped at the snowstorm with her arm as though she would wipe it
      away. She wanted to stamp on the universe....
And she ached, she ached....
Something caught her eye ahead, something that gleamed; it was exactly like a long, bare
      rather pinkish bone standing erect on the ground. Just because it was strange and queer she
      ran forward to it. Then as she came nearer she perceived it was a streak of barked trunk; a
      branch had been torn off a pine tree and the bark stripped down to the root. And then her foot
      hit against a freshly hewn stump, and then came another, poking its pinkish wounds above the
      snow. And there were chips! This filled her with
       wonder. Some one had been cutting wood! There must be Indians or trappers near,
      she thought, and then realized the wood-cutter could be none other than herself.
She turned to the right and saw the rocks rising steeply close at hand. "Oh Rag!" she cried,
      and fired her rifle in the air.
Ten seconds, twenty seconds, and then so loud and near it amazed her, came his answering
      shot. It sounded like the hillside bursting.
In another moment she had discovered the trail she had made overnight and that morning by
      dragging firewood. It was now a shallow soft white trench. Instantly her despair and fatigue
      had gone from her. Should she take a load of wood with her? she asked herself, in addition to
      the weight behind her, and had a better idea. She would unload and pile her stuff here, and
      bring him down on the sledge closer to the wood. She looked about and saw two rocks that
      diverged with a space between. She flashed schemes. She would trample the snow hard and flat,
      put her sledge on it, pile boughs and make a canopy of blanket overhead and behind. Then a
      fire in front.
She saw her camp admirable. She tossed her provisions down and ran up the broad windings of
      her pine-tree trail to Trafford, with the unloaded sledge bumping behind her. She ran as
      lightly as though she had done nothing that day.
She found him markedly recovered, weak and quiet, with snow drifting over his feet, his
      rifle across his knees, and his pipe alight. "Back already," he said, "but——"
He hesitated. "No grub?"
She knelt over him, gave his rough unshaven cheek a swift kiss, and very rapidly explained
      her plan.

In three days' time they were back at the hut, and
       the last two days they wore blue spectacles because of the mid-day glare of the
      sunlit snow.
It amazed Marjorie to discover as she lay awake in the camp on the edge of the ravine close
      to the hut to which she had lugged Trafford during the second day, that she was deeply happy.
      It was preposterous that she should be so, but those days of almost despairful stress were
      irradiated now by a new courage. She was doing this thing, against all Labrador and the
      snow-driving wind that blew from the polar wilderness, she was winning. It was a great
      discovery to her that hardship and effort almost to the breaking-point could ensue in so deep
      a satisfaction. She lay and thought how deep and rich life had become for her, as though in
      all this effort and struggle some unsuspected veil had been torn away. She perceived again,
      but now with no sense of desolation, that same infinite fragility of life which she had first
      perceived when she had watched the Aurora Borealis flickering up the sky. Beneath that
      realization and carrying it, as a river flood may carry scum, was a sense of herself as
      something deeper, greater, more enduring than mountain or wilderness or sky, or any of those
      monstrous forms of nature that had dwarfed her physical self to nothingness.
She had a persuasion of self detachment and illumination, and withal of self-discovery. She
      saw her life of time and space for what it was. Away in London the children, with the coldest
      of noses and the gayest of spirits, would be scampering about their bedrooms in the mild
      morning sunlight of a London winter; Elsie, the parlourmaid, would be whisking dexterous about
      the dining-room, the bacon would be cooking and the coffee-mill at work, the letters of the
       morning delivery perhaps just pattering into the letter-box, and all the bright
      little household she had made, with all the furniture she had arranged, all the characteristic
      decoration she had given it, all the clever convenient arrangements, would be getting itself
      into action for another day—and it wasn't herself! It was the extremest of her
      superficiality.
She had come out of all that, and even so it seemed she had come out of herself; this weary
      woman lying awake on the balsam boughs with a brain cleared by underfeeding and this
      continuous arduous bath of toil in snow-washed, frost cleansed, starry air, this, too, was no
      more than a momentarily clarified window for her unknown and indefinable reality. What was
      that reality? what was she herself? She became interested in framing an answer to that, and
      slipped down from the peace of soul she had attained. Her serenity gave way to a reiteration
      of this question, reiterations increasing and at last oppressing like the snowflakes of a
      storm, perpetual whirling repetitions that at last confused her and hid the sky....
She fell asleep....

With their return to the hut, Marjorie had found herself encountering a new set of
      urgencies. In their absence that wretched little wolverine had found great plenty and
      happiness in the tent and store-shed; its traces were manifest nearly everywhere, and it had
      particularly assailed the candles, after a destructive time among the frozen caribou beef. It
      had clambered up on the packages of sardines and jumped thence on to a sloping pole that it
      could claw along into the frame of the roof. She rearranged the packages, but that was no
      good. She could not leave Trafford
       in order to track the brute down, and for a night or so she could not think of
      any way of checking its depredations. It came each night.... Trafford kept her close at home.
      She had expected that when he was back in his bunk, secure and warm, he would heal rapidly,
      but instead he suddenly developed all the symptoms of a severe feverish cold, and his scars,
      which had seemed healing, became flushed and ugly-looking. Moreover, there was something wrong
      with his leg, an ominous ache that troubled her mind. Every woman, she decided, ought to know
      how to set a bone. He was unable to sleep by reason of these miseries, though very desirous of
      doing so. He became distressingly weak and inert, he ceased to care for food, and presently he
      began ta talk to himself with a complete disregard of her presence. Hourly she regretted her
      ignorance of medicine that left her with no conceivable remedy for all the aching and gnawing
      that worried and weakened him, except bathing with antiseptics and a liberal use of
      quinine.
And his face became strange to her, for over his flushed and sunken cheeks, under the raw
      spaces of the scar a blond beard bristled and grew. Presently, Trafford was a bearded man.
Incidentally, however, she killed the wolverine by means of a trap of her own contrivance, a
      loaded rifle with a bait of what was nearly her last candles, rigged to the trigger.
But this loss of the candles brought home to them the steady lengthening of the nights.
      Scarcely seven hours of day remained now in the black, cold grip of the darkness. And through
      those seventeen hours of chill aggression they had no light but the red glow of the stove. She
      had to close the door of the hut and bar every chink and cranny against the icy air, that
      became at last a murderous, freezing wind. Not
       only did she line the hut with every scrap of skin and paper she could obtain,
      but she went out with the spade toiling for three laborious afternoons in piling and beating
      snow against the outer frame. And now it was that Trafford talked at last, talked with
      something of the persistence of delirium, and she sat and listened hour by hour, silently, for
      he gave no heed to her or to anything she might say. He talked, it seemed, to God....

Darkness about a sullen glow of red, and a voice speaking.
The voice of a man, fevered and in pain, wounded and amidst hardship and danger, struggling
      with the unrelenting riddle of his being. Ever and again when a flame leapt she would see his
      face, haggard, bearded, changed, and yet infinitely familiar.
His voice varied, now high and clear, now mumbling, now vexed and expostulating, now rich
      with deep feeling, now fagged and slow; his matter varied, too; now he talked like one who is
      inspired, and now like one lost and confused, stupidly repeating phrases, going back upon a
      misleading argument, painfully, laboriously beginning over and over again. Marjorie sat before
      the stove watching it burn and sink, replenishing it, preparing food, and outside the bitter
      wind moaned and blew the powdery snow before it, and the shortening interludes of pallid,
      diffused daylight which pass for days in such weather, came and went. Intense cold had come
      now with leaden snowy days and starless nights.
Sometimes his speech filled her mind, seemed to fill all her world; sometimes she ceased to
      listen, following thoughts of her own. Sometimes she dozed;
       sometimes she awakened from sleep to find him talking. But slowly she realized a
      thread in his discourse, a progress and development.
Sometimes he talked of his early researches, and then he would trace computations with his
      hands as if he were using a blackboard, and became distressed to remember what he had written.
      Sometimes he would be under the claws of the lynx again, and fighting for his eyes. "Ugh!" he
      said, "keep those hind legs still. Keep your hind legs still! Knife? Knife? Ah! got it.
      Gu—u—u, you Beast!"
But the gist of his speech was determined by the purpose of his journey to Labrador. At last
      he was reviewing his life and hers, and all that their life might signify, even as he
      determined to do. She began to perceive that whatever else drifted into his mind and talk,
      this recurred and grew, that he returned to the conclusion he had reached, and not to the
      beginning of the matter, and went on from that....
"You see," he said, "our lives are nothing—nothing in themselves. I know that; I've never
      had any doubts of that. We individuals just pick up a mixed lot of things out of the powers
      that begat us, and lay them down again presently a little altered, that's all—heredities,
      traditions, the finger nails of my grandfather, a great-aunt's lips, the faith of a sect, the
      ideas of one's time. We live and then we die, and the threads run, dispersing this way and
      that. To make other people again. Whatever's immortal isn't that, our looks or our habits, our
      thoughts or our memories—just the shapes, these are, of one immortal stuff.... One immortal
      stuff."...
The voice died away as if he was baffled. Then it resumed.
"But we ought to partake of immortality; that's my point. We ought to partake of
      immortality.
"I mean we're like the little elements in a magnet;
       ought not to lie higgledy-piggledy, ought to point the same way, be
      polarized——Something microcosmic, you know, ought to be found in a man.
"Analogies run away with one. Suppose the bar isn't magnetized yet! Suppose purpose has to
      come; suppose the immortal stuff isn't yet, isn't being but struggling to be. Struggling to
      be.... Gods! that morning! When the child was born! And afterwards she was there—with a smile
      on her lips, and a little flushed and proud—as if nothing had happened so very much out of the
      way. Nothing so wonderful. And we had another life besides our own!..."
Afterwards he came back to that. "That was a good image," he said, "something trying to
      exist, which isn't substance, doesn't belong to space or time, something stifled and enclosed,
      struggling to get through. Just confused birth cries, eyes that hardly see, deaf ears, poor
      little thrusting hands. A thing altogether blind at first, a twitching and thrusting of
      protoplasm under the waters, and then the plants creeping up the beaches, the insects and
      reptiles on the margins of the rivers, beasts with a flicker of light in their eyes answering
      the sun. And at last, out of the long interplay of desire and fear, an ape, an ape that stared
      and wondered, and scratched queer pictures on a bone...."
He lapsed into silent thought for a time, and Marjorie glanced at his dim face in the
      shadows.
"I say nothing of ultimates," he said at last.
He repeated that twice before his thoughts would flow again.
"This is as much as I see, in time as I know it and space as I know it—something
       struggling to exist. It's true to the end of my limits. What can I say beyond that? It
      struggles to exist, becomes conscious,
       becomes now conscious of itself. That is where I come in, as a part of it. Above
      the beast in me is that—the desire to know better, to know—beautifully, and to transmit my
      knowledge. That's all there is in life for me beyond food and shelter and tidying up. This
      Being—opening its eyes, listening, trying to comprehend. Every good thing in man is
      that;—looking and making pictures, listening and making songs, making philosophies and
      sciences, trying new powers, bridge and engine, spark and gun. At the bottom of my soul,
       that. We began with bone-scratching. We're still—near it. I am just a part of this
      beginning—mixed with other things. Every book, every art, every religion is that, the attempt
      to understand and express—mixed with other things. Nothing else matters, nothing whatever. I
      tell you——Nothing whatever!
"I've always believed that. All my life I've believed that.
"Only I've forgotten."
"Every man with any brains believes that at the bottom of his heart. Only he gets busy and
      forgets. He goes shooting lynxes and breaks his leg. Odd, instinctive, brutal thing to do—to
      go tracking down a lynx to kill it! I grant you that, Marjorie. I grant you that."
"Grant me what?" she cried, startled beyond measure to hear herself addressed.
"Grant you that it is rather absurd to go hunting a lynx. And what big paws it
      has—disproportionately big! I wonder if that's an adaptation to snow. Tremendous paws they
      are.... But the real thing, I was saying, the real thing is to get knowledge, and express it.
      All things lead up to that. Civilization, social order, just for that. Except for that, all
      the life of man, all his affairs, his laws and police, his morals and manners—nonsense,
      nonsense,
       nonsense. Lynx hunts! Just ways of getting themselves mauled and clawed
      perhaps—into a state of understanding. Who knows?..."
His voice became low and clear.
"Understanding spreading like a dawn....
"Logic and language, clumsy implements, but rising to our needs, rising to our needs,
      thought clarified, enriched, reaching out to every man alive—some day—presently—touching every
      man alive, harmonizing acts and plans, drawing men into gigantic co-operations, tremendous
      co-operations....
"Until man shall stand upon this earth as upon a footstool and reach out his hand among the
      stars....
"And then I went into the rubber market, and spent seven years of my life driving shares up
      and down and into a net!... Queer game indeed! Stupid ass Behrens was—at bottom....
"There's a flaw in it somewhere...."
He came back to that several times before he seemed able to go on from it.
"There is a collective mind," he said, "a growing general consciousness—growing
      clearer. Something put me away from that, but I know it. My work, my thinking, was a part of
      it. That's why I was so mad about Behrens."
"Behrens?"
"Of course. He'd got a twist, a wrong twist. It makes me angry now. It will take years, it
      will eat up some brilliant man to clean up after Behrens——"
"Yes, but the point is"—his voice became acute—"why did I go making money and let Behrens
      in? Why generally and in all sorts of things does Behrens come in?..."
He was silent for a long time, and then he began to answer himself. "Of course," he said, "I
      said it—or
       somebody said it—about this collective mind being mixed with other things. It's
      something arising out of life—not the common stuff of life. An exhalation.... It's like the
      little tongues of fire that came at Pentecost.... Queer how one comes drifting back to these
      images. Perhaps I shall die a Christian yet.... The other Christians won't like me if I do.
      What was I saying?... It's what I reach up to, what I desire shall pervade me, not what I am.
      Just as far as I give myself purely to knowledge, to making feeling and thought clear in my
      mind and words, to the understanding and expression of the realities and relations of life,
      just so far do I achieve Salvation.... Salvation!...
"I wonder, is Salvation the same for every one? Perhaps for one man Salvation is research
      and thought, and for another expression in art, and for another nursing lepers. Provided he
      does it in the spirit. He has to do it in the spirit...."
There came a silence as though some difficulty baffled him, and he was feeling back to get
      his argument again.
"This flame that arises out of life, that redeems life from purposeless triviality,
       isn't life. Let me get hold of that. That's a point. That's a very important
      point."
Something had come to him.
"I've never talked of this to Marjorie. I've lived with her nine years and more, and never
      talked of religion. Not once. That's so queer of us. Any other couple in any other time would
      have talked religion no end.... People ought to."
Then he stuck out an argumentative hand. "You see, Marjorie is life," he said.
"She took me."
He spoke slowly, as though he traced things carefully.
       "Before I met her I suppose I wasn't half alive. No! Yet I don't remember I felt
      particularly incomplete. Women were interesting, of course; they excited me at times, that
      girl at Yonkers!—H'm. I stuck to my work. It was fine work, I forget half of it now, the
      half-concealed intimations I mean—queer how one forgets!—but I know I felt my way to wide,
      deep things. It was like exploring caves—monstrous, limitless caves. Such caves!... Very
      still—underground. Wonderful and beautiful.... They're lying there now for other men to seek.
      Other men will find them.... Then she came, as though she was taking possession. The
      beauty of her, oh! the life and bright eagerness, and the incompatibility! That's the riddle!
      I've loved her always. When she came to my arms it seemed to me the crown of life. Caves
      indeed! Old caves! Nothing else seemed to matter. But something did. All sorts of things did.
      I found that out soon enough. And when that first child was born. That for a time was
      supreme.... Yes—she's the quintessence of life, the dear greed of her, the appetite, the
      clever appetite for things. She grabs. She's so damned clever! The light in her eyes! Her
      quick sure hands!... Only my work was crowded out of my life and ended, and she didn't seem to
      feel it, she didn't seem to mind it. There was a sort of disregard. Disregard. As though all
      that didn't really matter...."
"My dear!" whispered Marjorie unheeded. She wanted to tell him it mattered now,
      mattered supremely, but she knew he had no ears for her.
His voice flattened. "It's perplexing," he said. "The two different things."
Then suddenly he cried out harshly: "I ought never to have married her—never, never! I had
      my task. I gave myself to her. Oh! the high immensities,
       the great and terrible things open to the mind of man! And we breed children and
      live in littered houses and play with our food and chatter, chatter, chatter. Oh, the chatter
      of my life! The folly! The women with their clothes. I can hear them rustle now, whiff the
      scent of it! The scandals—as though the things they did with themselves and each other
      mattered a rap; the little sham impromptu clever things, the trying to keep young—and
      underneath it all that continual cheating, cheating, cheating, damning struggle for
      money!...
"Marjorie, Marjorie, Marjorie! Why is she so good and no better! Why wasn't she worth it
      altogether?...
"No! I don't want to go on with it any more—ever. I want to go back.
"I want my life over again, and to go back.
"I want research, and the spirit of research that has died in me, and that still, silent
      room of mine again, that room, as quiet as a cell, and the toil that led to light. Oh! the
      coming of that light, the uprush of discovery, the solemn joy as the generalization rises like
      a sun upon the facts—floods them with a common meaning. That is what I want. That is what I
      have always wanted....
"Give me my time oh God! again; I am sick of this life I have chosen. I am sick of it!
      This—busy death! Give me my time again.... Why did you make me, and then waste me like this?
      Why are we made for folly upon folly? Folly! and brains made to scale high heaven, smeared
      into the dust! Into the dust, into the dust. Dust!..."
He passed into weak, wandering repetitions of disconnected sentences, that died into
      whispers and silence, and Marjorie watched him and listened to him, and waited with a
      noiseless dexterity upon his
       every need.

One day, she did not know what day, for she had lost count of the days, Marjorie set the
      kettle to boil and opened the door of the hut to look out, and the snow was ablaze with
      diamonds, and the air was sweet and still. It occurred to her that it would be well to take
      Trafford out into that brief brightness. She looked at him and found his eyes upon the
      sunlight quiet and rather wondering eyes.
"Would you like to get out into that?" she asked abruptly.
"Yes," he said, and seemed disposed to get up.
"You've got a broken leg," she cried, to arrest his movement, and he looked at her and
      answered: "Of course—I forgot."
She was all atremble that he should recognize her and speak to her. She pulled her rude old
      sledge alongside his bunk, and kissed him, and showed him how to shift and drop himself upon
      the plank. She took him in her arms and lowered him. He helped weakly but understandingly, and
      she wrapped him up warmly on the planks and lugged him out and built up a big fire at his
      feet, wondering, but as yet too fearful to rejoice, at the change that had come to him.
He said no more, but his eyes watched her move about with a kind of tired curiosity. He
      smiled for a time at the sun, and shut his eyes, and still faintly smiling, lay still. She had
      a curious fear that if she tried to talk to him this new lucidity would vanish again. She went
      about the business of the morning, glancing at him ever and again, until suddenly the calm of
      his upturned face smote her, and she ran to
       him and crouched down to him between hope and a terrible fear, and found that he
      was sleeping, and breathing very lightly, sleeping with the deep unconsciousness of a
      child....
When he awakened the sun was red in the west. His eyes met hers, and he seemed a little
      puzzled.
"I've been sleeping, Madge?" he said.
She nodded.
"And dreaming? I've a vague sort of memory of preaching and preaching in a kind of black,
      empty place, where there wasn't anything.... A fury of exposition... a kind of argument.... I
      say!—Is there such a thing in the world as a new-laid egg—and some bread-and-butter?"
He seemed to reflect. "Of course," he said, "I broke my leg. Gollys! I thought that beast
      was going to claw my eyes out. Lucky, Madge, it didn't get my eyes. It was just a chance it
      didn't."
He stared at her.
"I say," he said, "you've had a pretty rough time! How long has this been going on?"
He amazed her by rising himself on his elbow and sitting up.
"Your leg!" she cried.
He put his hand down and felt it. "Pretty stiff," he said. "You get me some food—there
       were some eggs, Madge, frozen new-laid, anyhow—and then we'll take these splints off
      and feel about a bit. Eh! why not? How did you get me out of that scrape, Madge? I thought I'd
      got to be froze as safe as eggs. (Those eggs ought to be all right, you know. If you put them
      on in a saucepan and wait until they boil.) I've a sort of muddled impression.... By Jove,
      Madge, you've had a time! I say you have had a time!"
His eyes, full of a warmth of kindliness she had
       not seen for long weeks, scrutinized her face. "I say!" he repeated, very
      softly.
All her strength went from her at his tenderness. "Oh, my dear," she wailed, kneeling at his
      side, "my dear, dear!" and still regardful of his leg, she yet contrived to get herself
      weeping into his coveted arms.
He regarded her, he held her, he patted her back! The infinite luxury to her! He'd come
      back. He'd come back to her.
"How long has it been?" he asked. "Poor dear! Poor dear! How long can it have been?"

From that hour Trafford mended. He remained clear-minded, helpful, sustaining. His face
      healed daily. Marjorie had had to cut away great fragments of gangrenous frozen flesh, and he
      was clearly destined to have a huge scar over forehead and cheek, but in that pure, clear air,
      once the healing had begun it progressed swiftly. His leg had set, a little shorter than its
      fellow and with a lump in the middle of the shin, but it promised to be a good serviceable leg
      none the less. They examined it by the light of the stove with their heads together, and
      discussed when it would be wise to try it. How do doctors tell when a man may stand on his
      broken leg? She had a vague impression you must wait six weeks, but she could not remember why
      she fixed upon that time.
"It seems a decent interval," said Trafford. "We'll try it."
She had contrived a crutch for him against that momentous experiment, and he sat up in his
      bunk, pillowed up by a sack and her rugs, and whittled it smooth, and padded the fork with the
      skin of that slaughtered wolverine, poor victim of hunger!—while
       she knelt by the stove feeding it with logs, and gave him an account of their
      position.
"We're somewhere in the middle of December," she said, "somewhere between the twelfth and
      the fourteenth,—yes! I'm as out as that!—and I've handled the stores pretty freely. So did
      that little beast until I got him." She nodded at the skin in his hand. "I don't see myself
      shooting much now, and so far I've not been able to break the ice to fish. It's too much for
      me. Even if it isn't too late to fish. This book we've got describes barks and mosses, and
      that will help, but if we stick here until the birds and things come, we're going to be
      precious short. We may have to last right into July. I've plans—but it may come to that. We
      ought to ration all the regular stuff, and trust to luck for a feast. The rations!—I don't
      know what they'll come to."
"Right O," said Trafford admiring her capable gravity. "Let's ration."
"Marjorie," he asked abruptly, "are you sorry we came?"
Her answer came unhesitatingly. "No!"
"Nor I."
He paused. "I've found you out," he said. "Dear dirty living thing!... You are
      dirty, you know."
"I've found myself," she answered, thinking. "I feel as if I've never loved you until this
      hut. I suppose I have in my way——"
"Lugano," he suggested. "Don't let's forget good things, Marjorie. Oh! And endless
      times!"
"Oh, of course! As for that——! But now—now you're in my bones. We were just two
      shallow, pretty, young things—loving. It was sweet, dear—sweet as youth—but not this. Unkempt
      and weary—then one understands love. I suppose I am dirty.
       Think of it! I've lugged you through the snow till my shoulders chafed and bled.
      I cried with pain, and kept on lugging——Oh, my dear! my dear!" He kissed her hair. "I've held
      you in my arms to keep you from freezing. (I'd have frozen myself first.) We've got to starve
      together perhaps before the end.... Dear, if I could make you, you should eat me.... I'm—I'm
      beginning to understand. I've had a light. I've begun to understand. I've begun to see what
      life has been for you, and how I've wasted—wasted."
"We've wasted!"
"No," she said, "it was I."
She sat back on the floor and regarded him. "You don't remember things you said—when you
      were delirious?"
"No," he answered. "What did I say?"
"Nothing?"
"Nothing clearly. What did I say?"
"It doesn't matter. No, indeed. Only you made me understand. You'd never have told me.
      You've always been a little weak with me there. But it's plain to me why we didn't keep our
      happiness, why we were estranged. If we go back alive, we go back—all that settled for good
      and all."
"What?"
"That discord. My dear, I've been a fool, selfish, ill-trained and greedy. We've both been
      floundering about, but I've been the mischief of it. Yes, I've been the trouble. Oh, it's had
      to be so. What are we women—half savages, half pets, unemployed things of greed and desire—and
      suddenly we want all the rights and respect of souls! I've had your life in my hands from the
      moment we met together. If I had known.... It isn't that we can make you or guide you—I'm not
      pretending to be an inspiration—but—but
       we can release you. We needn't press upon you; we can save you from the
      instincts and passions that try to waste you altogether on us.... Yes, I'm beginning to
      understand. Oh, my child, my husband, my man! You talked of your wasted life!... I've been
      thinking—since first we left the Mersey. I've begun to see what it is to be a woman. For the
      first time in my life. We're the responsible sex. And we've forgotten it. We think we've done
      a wonder if we've borne men into the world and smiled a little, but indeed we've got to bear
      them all our lives.... A woman has to be steadier than a man and more self-sacrificing than a
      man, because when she plunges she does more harm than a man.... And what does she achieve if
      she does plunge? Nothing—nothing worth counting. Dresses and carpets and hangings and pretty
      arrangements, excitements and satisfactions and competition and more excitements. We can't
       do things. We don't bring things off! And you, you Monster! you Dream! you want to
      stick your hand out of all that is and make something that isn't, begin to be! That's the
      man——"
"Dear old Madge!" he said, "there's all sorts of women and all sorts of men."
"Well, our sort of women, then, and our sort of men."
"I doubt even that."
"I don't. I've found my place. I've been making my master my servant. We women—we've been
      looting all the good things in the world, and helping nothing. You've carried me on your back
      until you are loathing life. I've been making you fetch and carry for me, love me, dress me,
      keep me and my children, minister to my vanities and greeds.... No; let me go on. I'm so
      penitent, my dear, so penitent I want to kneel down here and marry you all over again,
       heal up your broken life and begin again."...
She paused.
"One doesn't begin again," she said. "But I want to take a new turn. Dear, you're still only
      a young man; we've thirty or forty years before us—forty years perhaps or more.... What shall
      we do with our years? We've loved, we've got children. What remains? Here we can plan it out,
      work it out, day after day. What shall we do with our lives and life? Tell me, make me your
      partner; it's you who know, what are we doing with life?"

What are we doing with life?
That question overtakes a reluctant and fugitive humanity. The Traffords were but two of a
      great scattered host of people, who, obeying all the urgencies of need and desire, struggling,
      loving, begetting, enjoying, do nevertheless find themselves at last unsatisfied. They have
      lived the round of experience, achieved all that living creatures have sought since the
      beginning of the world—security and gratification and offspring—and they find themselves still
      strong, unsatiated, with power in their hands and years before them, empty of purpose. What
      are they to do?
The world presents such a spectacle of evasion as it has never seen before. Never was there
      such a boiling over and waste of vital energy. The Sphinx of our opportunity calls for the
      uttermost powers of heart and brain to read its riddle—the new, astonishing riddle of
      excessive power. A few give themselves to those honourable adventures that extend the range of
      man, they explore untravelled countries, climb remote mountains, conduct researches, risk life
      and limb
       in the fantastic experiments of flight, and a monstrous outpouring of labour and
      material goes on in the strenuous preparation for needless and improbable wars. The rest
      divert themselves with the dwarfish satisfactions of recognized vice, the meagre routine of
      pleasure, or still more timidly with sport and games—those new unscheduled perversions of the
      soul.
We are afraid of our new selves. The dawn of human opportunity appals us. Few of us dare
      look upon this strange light of freedom and limitless resources that breaks upon our
      world.
"Think," said Trafford, "while we sit here in this dark hut—think of the surplus life that
      wastes itself in the world for sheer lack of direction. Away there in England—I suppose that
      is westward"—he pointed—"there are thousands of men going out to-day to shoot. Think of the
      beautifully made guns, the perfected ammunition, the excellent clothes, the army of beaters,
      the carefully preserved woodland, the admirable science of it—all for that idiot massacre of
      half-tame birds! Just because man once had need to be a hunter! Think of the others
      again—golfing. Think of the big, elaborate houses from which they come, the furnishings, the
      service. And the women—dressing! Perpetually dressing. You, Marjorie—you've done
      nothing but dress since we married. No, let me abuse you, dear! It's insane, you know! You
      dress your minds a little to talk amusingly, you spread your minds out to backgrounds, to
      households, picturesque and delightful gardens, nurseries. Those nurseries! Think of our
      tremendously cherished and educated children! And when they grow up, what have we got for
      them? A feast of futility...."

On the evening of the day when Trafford first
       tried to stand upon his leg, they talked far into the night. It had been a great
      and eventful day for them, full of laughter and exultation. He had been at first ridiculously
      afraid; he had clung to her almost childishly, and she had held him about the body with his
      weight on her strong right arm and his right arm in her left hand, concealing her own dread of
      a collapse under a mask of taunting courage. The crutch had proved admirable. "It's my silly
      knees!" Trafford kept on saying. "The leg's all right, but I get put out by my silly
      knees."
They made the day a feast, a dinner of two whole day's rations and a special soup instead of
      supper. "The birds will come," they explained to each other, "ducks and geese, long before
      May. May, you know, is the latest."
Marjorie confessed the habit of sharing his pipe was growing on her. "What shall we do in
      Tyburnia!" she said, and left it to the imagination.
"If ever we get back there," he said.
"I don't much fancy kicking a skirt before my shins again—and I'll be a black, coarse woman
      down to my neck at dinner for years to come!..."
Then, as he lay back in his bunk and she crammed the stove with fresh boughs and twigs of
      balsam that filled the little space about them with warmth and with a faint, sweet smell of
      burning and with flitting red reflections, he took up a talk about religion they had begun
      some days before.
"You see," he said, "I've always believed in Salvation. I suppose a man's shy of saying
      so—even to his wife. But I've always believed more or less distinctly that there was something
      up to which a life worked—always. It's been rather vague, I'll admit.
       I don't think I've ever believed in individual salvation. You see, I feel these
      are deep things, and the deeper one gets the less individual one becomes. That's why one
      thinks of those things in darkness and loneliness—and finds them hard to tell. One has an
      individual voice, or an individual birthmark, or an individualized old hat, but the soul—the
      soul's different.... It isn't me talking to you when it comes to that.... This question of
      what we are doing with life isn't a question to begin with for you and me as ourselves, but
      for you and me as mankind. Am I spinning it too fine, Madge?"
"No," she said, intent; "go on."
"You see, when we talk rations here, Marjorie, it's ourselves, but when we talk
      religion—it's mankind. You've either got to be Everyman in religion or leave it alone. That's
      my idea. It's no more presumptuous to think for the race than it is for a beggar to
      pray—though that means going right up to God and talking to Him. Salvation's a collective
      thing and a mystical thing—or there isn't any. Fancy the Almighty and me sitting up and
      keeping Eternity together! God and R. A. G. Trafford, F.R.S.—that's silly. Fancy a man in
      number seven boots, and a tailor-made suit in the nineteen-fourteen fashion, sitting before
      God! That's caricature. But God and Man! That's sense, Marjorie."...
He stopped and stared at her.
Marjorie sat red-lit, regarding him. "Queer things you say!" she said. "So much of this I've
      never thought out. I wonder why I've never done so.... Too busy with many things, I suppose.
      But go on and tell me more of these secrets you've kept from me!"
"Well, we've got to talk of these things as mankind—or just leave them alone, and shoot
       pheasants."...
"If I could shoot a pheasant now!" whispered Marjorie, involuntarily.
"And where do we stand? What do we need—I mean the whole race of us—kings and beggars
      together? You know, Marjorie, it's this,—it's Understanding. That's what mankind has got to,
      the realization that it doesn't understand, that it can't express, that it's purblind. We
      haven't got eyes for those greater things, but we've got the promise—the intimation of eyes.
      We've come out of an unsuspecting darkness, brute animal darkness, not into sight, that's been
      the mistake, but into a feeling of illumination, into a feeling of light shining through our
      opacity....
"I feel that man has now before all things to know. That's his supreme duty, to feel,
      realize, see, understand, express himself to the utmost limits of his power."
He sat up, speaking very earnestly to her, and in that flickering light she realized for the
      first time how thin he had become, how bright and hollow his eyes, his hair was long over his
      eyes, and a rough beard flowed down to his chest. "All the religions," he said, "all the
      philosophies, have pretended to achieve too much. We've no language yet for religious truth or
      metaphysical truth; we've no basis yet broad enough and strong enough on which to build.
      Religion and philosophy have been impudent and quackish—quackish! They've been like the
      doctors, who have always pretended they could cure since the beginning of things, cure
      everything, and to this day even they haven't got more than the beginnings of knowledge on
      which to base a cure. They've lacked humility, they've lacked the honour to say they didn't
      know; the priests took things of wood and stone, the
       philosophers took little odd arrangements of poor battered words, metaphors,
      analogies, abstractions, and said: "That's it! Think of their silly old Absolute,—ab-solutus,
      an untied parcel. I heard Haldane at the Aristotelian once, go on for an hour—no! it was
      longer than an hour—as glib and slick as a well-oiled sausage-machine, about the different
      sorts of Absolute, and not a soul of us laughed out at him! The vanity of such profundities!
      They've no faith, faith in patience, faith to wait for the coming of God. And since we don't
      know God, since we don't know His will with us, isn't it plain that all our lives should be a
      search for Him and it? Can anything else matter,—after we are free from necessity? That is the
      work now that is before all mankind, to attempt understanding—by the perpetual finding of
      thought and the means of expression, by perpetual extension and refinement of science, by the
      research that every artist makes for beauty and significance in his art, by the perpetual
      testing and destruction and rebirth under criticism of all these things, and by a perpetual
      extension of this intensifying wisdom to more minds and more minds and more, till all men
      share in it, and share in the making of it.... There you have my creed, Marjorie; there you
      have the very marrow of me."...
He became silent.
"Will you go back to your work?" she said, abruptly. "Go back to your laboratory?"
He stared at her for a moment without speaking. "Never," he said at last.
"But," she said, and the word dropped from her like a stone that falls down a well....
"My dear," he said, at last, "I've thought of that. But since I left that dear, dusty little
      laboratory, and all those exquisite subtle things—I've lived. I've left that man seven long
      years behind me. Some
       other man must go on—I think some younger man—with the riddles I found to work
      on then. I've grown—into something different. It isn't how atoms swing with one another, or
      why they build themselves up so and not so, that matters any more to me. I've got you and all
      the world in which we live, and a new set of riddles filling my mind, how thought swings about
      thought, how one man attracts his fellows, how the waves of motive and conviction sweep
      through a crowd and all the little drifting crystallizations of spirit with spirit and all the
      repulsions and eddies and difficulties, that one can catch in that turbulent confusion. I want
      to do a new sort of work now altogether.... Life has swamped me once, but I don't think it
      will get me under again;—I want to study men."
He paused and she waited, with a face aglow.
"I want to go back to watch and think—and I suppose write. I believe I shall write
      criticism. But everything that matters is criticism!... I want to get into contact with the
      men who are thinking. I don't mean to meet them necessarily, but to get into the souls of
      their books. Every writer who has anything to say, every artist who matters, is the stronger
      for every man or woman who responds to him. That's the great work—the Reality. I want to
      become a part of this stuttering attempt to express, I want at least to resonate, even if I do
      not help.... And you with me, Marjorie—you with me! Everything I write I want you to see and
      think about. I want you to read as I read.... Now after so long, now that, now that we've
      begun to talk, you know, talk again——"
Something stopped his voice. Something choked them both into silence. He held out a lean
      hand, and she shuffled on her knees to take it....
"Don't please make me," she stumbled through
       her thoughts, "one of those little parasitic, parroting wives—don't pretend too
      much about me—because you want me with you——. Don't forget a woman isn't a man."
"Old Madge," he said, "you and I have got to march together. Didn't I love you from the
      first, from that time when I was a boy examiner and you were a candidate girl—because your
      mind was clear?"
"And we will go back," she whispered, "with a work——"
"With a purpose," he said.
She disengaged herself from his arm, and sat close to him upon the floor. "I think I can see
      what you will do," she said. She mused. "For the first time I begin to see things as they may
      be for us. I begin to see a life ahead. For the very first time."
Queer ideas came drifting into her head. Suddenly she cried out sharply in that high note he
      loved. "Good heavens!" she said. "The absurdity! The infinite absurdity!"
"But what?"
"I might have married Will Magnet——. That's all."
She sprang to her feet. There came a sound of wind outside, a shifting of snow on the roof,
      and the door creaked. "Half-past eleven," she exclaimed looking at the watch that hung in the
      light of the stove door. "I don't want to sleep yet; do you? I'm going to brew some tea—make a
      convivial drink. And then we will go on talking. It's so good talking to you. So good!... I've
      an idea! Don't you think on this special day, it might run to a biscuit?" Her face was keenly
      anxious. He nodded. "One biscuit each," she said, trying to rob her voice of any note of
      criminality. "Just one, you know, won't matter."
She hovered for some moments close to the stove
       before she went into the arctic corner that contained the tin of tea. "If we can
      really live like that!" she said. "When we are home again."
"Why not?" he answered.
She made no answer, but went across for the tea....
He turned his head at the sound of the biscuit tin and watched her put out the precious
      discs.
"I shall have another pipe," he proclaimed, with an agreeable note of excess. "Thank heaven
      for unstinted tobacco...."
And now Marjorie's mind was teaming with thoughts of this new conception of a life lived for
      understanding. As she went about the preparation of the tea, her vividly concrete imagination
      was active with the realization of the life they would lead on their return. She could not see
      it otherwise than framed in a tall, fine room, a study, a study in sombre tones, with high,
      narrow, tall, dignified bookshelves and rich deep green curtains veiling its windows. There
      should be a fireplace of white marble, very plain and well proportioned, with furnishings of
      old brass, and a big desk towards the window beautifully lit by electric light, with abundant
      space for papers to lie. And she wanted some touch of the wilderness about it; a skin
      perhaps....
The tea was still infusing when she had determined upon an enormous paper-weight of that
      iridescent Labradorite that had been so astonishing a feature of the Green River Valley. She
      would have it polished on one side only—the other should be rough to show the felspar in its
      natural state....
It wasn't that she didn't feel and understand quite fully the intention and significance of
      all he had said, but that in these symbols of texture and equipment her mind quite naturally
      clothed itself. And
       while this room was coming into anticipatory being in her mind, she was making
      the tea very deftly and listening to Trafford's every word.

That talk marked an epoch to Marjorie. From that day forth her imagination began to shape a
      new, ordered and purposeful life for Trafford and herself in London, a life not altogether
      divorced from their former life, but with a faith sustaining it and aims controlling it. She
      had always known of the breadth and power of his mind, but now as he talked of what he might
      do, what interests might converge and give results through him, it seemed she really knew him
      for the first time. In his former researches, so technical and withdrawn, she had seen little
      of his mind in action: now he was dealing in his own fashion with things she could clearly
      understand. There were times when his talk affected her like that joy of light one has in
      emerging into sunshine from a long and tedious cave. He swept things together, flashed
      unsuspected correlations upon her intelligence, smashed and scattered absurd yet venerated
      conventions of thought, made undreamt-of courses of action visible in a flare of luminous
      necessity. And she could follow him and help him. Just as she had hampered him and crippled
      him, so now she could release him—she fondled that word. She found a preposterous image in her
      mind that she hid like a disgraceful secret, that she tried to forget, and yet its stupendous,
      its dreamlike absurdity had something in it that shaped her delight as nothing else could do;
      she was, she told herself—hawking with an archangel!...
These were her moods of exaltation. And she
       was sure she had never loved her man before, that this was indeed her beginning.
      It was as if she had just found him....
Perhaps, she thought, true lovers keep on finding each other all through their lives.
And he too had discovered her. All the host of Marjories he had known, the shining,
      delightful, seductive, wilful, perplexing aspects that had so filled her life, gave place
      altogether for a time to this steady-eyed woman, lean and warm-wrapped with the valiant heart
      and the frost-roughened skin. What a fine, strong, ruddy thing she was! How glad he was for
      this wild adventure in the wilderness, if only because it had made him lie among the rocks and
      think of her and wait for her and despair of her life and God, and at last see her coming back
      to him, flushed with effort and calling his name to him out of that whirlwind of snow.... And
      there was at least one old memory mixed up with all these new and overmastering impressions,
      the memory of her clear unhesitating voice as it had stabbed into his life again long years
      ago, minute and bright in the telephone: "It's me, you know. It's Marjorie!"
Perhaps after all she had not wasted a moment of his life, perhaps every issue between them
      had been necessary, and it was good altogether to be turned from the study of crystals to the
      study of men and women....
And now both their minds were Londonward, where all the tides and driftage and currents of
      human thought still meet and swirl together. They were full of what they would do when they
      got back. Marjorie sketched that study to him—in general terms and without the
      paper-weight—and began to shape the world she would have about it. She meant to be his squaw
      and body-servant first of all, and then—a
       mother. Children, she said, are none the worse for being kept a little out of
      focus. And he was rapidly planning out his approach to the new questions to which he was now
      to devote his life. "One wants something to hold the work together," he said, and projected a
      book. "One cannot struggle at large for plain statement and copious and free and courageous
      statement, one needs a positive attack."
He designed a book, which he might write if only for the definition it would give him and
      with no ultimate publication, which was to be called: "The Limits of Language as a Means of
      Expression." ... It was to be a pragmatist essay, a sustained attempt to undermine the
      confidence of all that scholasticism and logic chopping which still lingers like the
       sequelæ of a disease in our University philosophy. "Those duffers sit in their
      studies and make a sort of tea of dry old words—and think they're distilling the spirit of
      wisdom," he said.
He proliferated titles for a time, and settled at last on "From Realism to Reality." He
      wanted to get at that at once; it fretted him to have to hang in the air, day by day, for want
      of books to quote and opponents to lance and confute. And he wanted to see pictures, too and
      plays, read novels he had heard of and never read, in order to verify or correct the ideas
      that were seething in his mind about the qualities of artistic expression. His thought had
      come out to a conviction that the line to wider human understandings lies through a huge
      criticism and cleaning up of the existing methods of formulation, as a preliminary to the
      wider and freer discussion of those religious and social issues our generation still shrinks
      from. "It's grotesque," he said, "and utterly true that the sanity and happiness of all the
      world lies in its habits of generalization." There was not
       even paper for him to make notes or provisional drafts of the new work. He
      hobbled about the camp fretting at these deprivations.
"Marjorie," he said, "we've done our job. Why should we wait here on this frosty shelf
      outside the world? My leg's getting sounder—if it wasn't for that feeling of ice in it. Why
      shouldn't we make another sledge from the other bunk and start down—"
"To Hammond?"
"Why not?"
"But the way?"
"The valley would guide us. We could do four hours a day before we had to camp. I'm not sure
      we couldn't try the river. We could drag and carry all our food...."
She looked down the wide stretches of the valley. There was the hill they had christened
      Marjorie Ridge. At least it was familiar. Every night before nightfall if they started there
      would be a fresh camping place to seek among the snow-drifts, a great heap of wood to cut to
      last the night. Suppose his leg gave out—when they were already some days away, so that he
      could no longer go on or she drag him back to the stores. Plainly there would be nothing for
      it then but to lie down and die together....
And a sort of weariness had come to her as a consequence of two months of half-starved days,
      not perhaps a failure so much as a reluctance of spirit.
"Of course," she said, with a new aspect drifting before her mind, "then—we could
      eat. We could feed up before we started. We could feast almost!"

"While you were asleep the other night," Trafford began one day as they sat spinning out
      their mid-day meal, "I was thinking how badly I had expressed
       myself when I talked to you the other day, and what a queer, thin affair I made
      of the plans I wanted to carry out. As a matter of fact, they're neither queer nor thin, but
      they are unreal in comparison with the common things of everyday life, hunger, anger, all the
      immediate desires. They must be. They only begin when those others are at peace. It's hard to
      set out these things; they're complicated and subtle, and one cannot simplify without
      falsehood. I don't want to simplify. The world has gone out of its way time after time through
      simplifications and short cuts. Save us from epigrams! And when one thinks over what one has
      said, at a little distance,—one wants to go back to it, and say it all again. I seem to be not
      so much thinking things out as reviving and developing things I've had growing in my mind ever
      since we met. It's as though an immense reservoir of thought had filled up in my mind at last
      and was beginning to trickle over and break down the embankment between us. This conflict that
      has been going on between our life together and my—my intellectual life; it's only just
      growing clear in my own mind. Yet it's just as if one turned up a light on something that had
      always been there....
"It's a most extraordinary thing to think out, Marjorie, that antagonism. Our love has kept
      us so close together and always our purposes have been—like that." He spread divergent hands.
      "I've speculated again and again whether there isn't something incurably antagonistic between
      women (that's you generalized, Marjorie) and men (that's me) directly we pass beyond
      the conditions of the individualistic struggle. I believe every couple of lovers who've ever
      married have felt that strain. Yet it's not a difference in kind between us but degree. The
      big conflict between us has a parallel in a little internal conflict
       that goes on; there's something of man in every woman and a touch of the
      feminine in every man. But you're nearer as woman to the immediate personal life of sense and
      reality than I am as man. It's been so ever since the men went hunting and fighting and the
      women kept hut, tended the children and gathered roots in the little cultivation close at
      hand. It's been so perhaps since the female carried and suckled her child and distinguished
      one male from another. It may be it will always be so. Men were released from that close,
      continuous touch with physical necessities long before women were. It's only now that women
      begin to be released. For ages now men have been wandering from field and home and city, over
      the hills and far away, in search of adventures and fresh ideas and the wells of mystery
      beyond the edge of the world, but it's only now that the woman comes with them too. Our
      difference isn't a difference in kind, old Marjorie; it's the difference between the old
      adventurer and the new feet upon the trail."
"We've got to come," said Marjorie.
"Oh! you've got to come. No good to be pioneers if the race does not follow. The women are
      the backbone of the race; the men are just the individuals. Into this Labrador and into all
      the wild and desolate places of thought and desire, if men come you women have to come too—and
      bring the race with you. Some day."
"A long day, mate of my heart."
"Who knows how long or how far? Aren't you at any rate here, dear woman of mine....
       (Surely you are here)."
He went off at a tangent. "There's all those words that seem to mean something and then
      don't seem to mean anything, that keep shifting to and
       fro from the deepest significance to the shallowest of claptrap, Socialism,
      Christianity.... You know,—they aren't anything really, as yet; they are something trying to
      be.... Haven't I said that before, Marjorie?"
She looked round at him. "You said something like that when you were delirious," she
      answered, after a little pause. "It's one of the ideas that you're struggling with. You go on,
      old man, and talk. We've months—for repetitions."
"Well, I mean that all these things are seeking after a sort of co-operation that's greater
      than our power even of imaginative realization; that's what I mean. The kingdom of Heaven, the
      communion of saints, the fellowship of men; these are things like high peaks far out of the
      common life of every day, shining things that madden certain sorts of men to climb. Certain
      sorts of us! I'm a religious man, I'm a socialistic man. These calls are more to me than my
      daily bread. I've got something in me more generalizing than most men. I'm more so than many
      other men and most other women, I'm more socialistic than you...."
"You know, Marjorie, I've always felt you're a finer individual than me, I've never had a
      doubt of it. You're more beautiful by far than I, woman for my man. You've a keener appetite
      for things, a firmer grip on the substance of life. I love to see you do things, love to see
      you move, love to watch your hands; you've cleverer hands than mine by far.... And yet—I'm a
      deeper and bigger thing than you. I reach up to something you don't reach up to.... You're in
      life—and I'm a little out of it, I'm like one of those fish that began to be amphibian, I go
      out into something where you don't follow—where you hardly begin to follow.
"That's the real perplexity between thousands of
       men and women....
"It seems to me that the primitive socialism of Christianity and all the stuff of modern
      socialism that matters is really aiming—almost unconsciously, I admit at times—at one simple
      end, at the release of the human spirit from the individualistic struggle——
"You used 'release' the other day, Marjorie? Of course, I remember. It's queer how I go on
      talking after you have understood."
"It was just a flash," said Marjorie. "We have intimations. Neither of us really
      understands. We're like people climbing a mountain in a mist, that thins out for a moment and
      shows valleys and cities, and then closes in again, before we can recognize them or make out
      where we are."
Trafford thought. "When I talk to you, I've always felt I mustn't be too vague. And the very
      essence of all this is a vague thing, something we shall never come nearer to it in all our
      lives than to see it as a shadow and a glittering that escapes again into a mist.... And yet
      it's everything that matters, everything, the only thing that matters truly and for ever
      through the whole range of life. And we have to serve it with the keenest thought, the utmost
      patience, inordinate veracity....
"The practical trouble between your sort and my sort, Marjorie, is the trouble between faith
      and realization. You demand the outcome. Oh! and I hate to turn aside and realize. I've had to
      do it for seven years. Damnable years! Men of my sort want to understand. We want to
      understand, and you ask us to make. We want to understand atoms, ions, molecules, refractions.
      You ask us to make rubber and diamonds. I suppose it's right that incidentally we should make
      rubber and diamonds. Finally,
       I warn you, we will make rubber unnecessary and diamonds valueless. And again we
      want to understand how people react upon one another to produce social consequences, and you
      ask us to put it at once into a draft bill for the reform of something or other. I suppose
      life lies between us somewhere, we're the two poles of truth seeking and truth getting; with
      me alone it would be nothing but a luminous dream, with you nothing but a scramble in which
      sooner or later all the lamps would be upset.... But it's ever too much of a scramble yet, and
      ever too little of a dream. All our world over there is full of the confusion and wreckage of
      premature realizations. There's no real faith in thought and knowledge yet. Old necessity has
      driven men so hard that they still rush with a wild urgency—though she goads no more. Greed
      and haste, and if, indeed, we seem to have a moment's breathing space, then the Gawdsaker
      tramples us under."
"My dear!" cried Marjorie, with a sharp note of amusement. "What is a
      Gawdsaker?"
"Oh," said Trafford, "haven't you heard that before? He's the person who gets excited by any
      deliberate discussion and gets up wringing his hands and screaming, 'For Gawd's sake, let's
       do something now!' I think they used it first for Pethick Lawrence, that
      man who did so much to run the old militant suffragettes and burke the proper discussion of
      woman's future. You know. You used to have 'em in Chelsea—with their hats. Oh! 'Gawdsaking' is
      the curse of all progress, the hectic consumption that kills a thousand good beginnings. You
      see it in small things and in great. You see it in my life; Gawdsaking turned my life-work to
      cash and promotions, Gawdsaking——Look at the way the aviators took to flying for prizes and
      gate-money, the way
       pure research is swamped by endowments for technical applications! Then that
      poor ghost-giant of an idea the socialists have;—it's been treated like one of those unborn
      lambs they kill for the fine skin of it, made into results before ever it was alive. Was there
      anything more pitiful? The first great dream and then the last phase! when your Aunt
      Plessington and the district visitors took and used it as a synonym for Payment in Kind....
      It's natural, I suppose, for people to be eager for results, personal and immediate
      results—the last lesson of life is patience. Naturally they want reality, naturally! They want
      the individual life, something to handle and feel and use and live by, something of their very
      own before they die, and they want it now. But the thing that matters for the race, Marjorie,
      is a very different thing; it is to get the emerging thought process clear and to keep it
      clear—and to let those other hungers go. We've got to go back to England on the side of that
      delay, that arrest of interruption, that detached, observant, synthesizing process of the
      mind, that solvent of difficulties and obsolescent institutions, which is the reality of
      collective human life. We've got to go back on the side of pure science—literature untrammeled
      by the preconceptions of the social schemers—art free from the urgency of immediate
      utility—and a new, a regal, a god-like sincerity in philosophy. And, above all, we've got to
      stop this Jackdaw buying of yours, my dear, which is the essence of all that is wrong with the
      world, this snatching at everything, which loses everything worth having in life, this greedy
      confused realization of our accumulated resources! You're going to be a non-shopping woman
      now. You're to come out of Bond Street, you and your kind, like Israel leaving the Egyptian
      flesh-pots. You're going
       to be my wife and my mate.... Less of this service of things. Investments in
      comfort, in security, in experience, yes; but not just spending any more...."
He broke off abruptly with: "I want to go back and begin."
"Yes," said Marjorie, "we will go back," and saw minutely and distantly, and yet as clearly
      and brightly as if she looked into a concave mirror, that tall and dignified study, a very
      high room indeed, with a man writing before a fine, long-curtained window and a great lump of
      rich-glowing Labradorite upon his desk before him holding together an accumulation of written
      sheets....
She knew exactly the shop in Oxford Street where the stuff for the curtains might be best
      obtained.

One night Marjorie had been sitting musing before the stove for a long time, and suddenly
      she said: "I wonder if we shall fail. I wonder if we shall get into a mess again when we are
      back in London.... As big a mess and as utter a discontent as sent us here...."
Trafford was scraping out his pipe, and did not answer for some moments. Then he remarked:
      "What nonsense!"
"But we shall," she said. "Everybody fails. To some extent, we are bound to fail. Because
      indeed nothing is clear; nothing is a clear issue.... You know—I'm just the old Marjorie
      really in spite of all these resolutions—the spendthrift, the restless, the eager. I'm a born
      snatcher and shopper. We're just the same people really."
"No," he said, after thought. "You're all Labrador older."
"I always have failed," she considered, "when it
       came to any special temptations, Rag. I can't stand not having a
      thing!"
He made no answer.
"And you're still the same old Rag, you know," she went on. "Who weakens into kindness if I
      cry. Who likes me well-dressed. Who couldn't endure to see me poor."
"Not a bit of it. No! I'm a very different Rag with a very different Marjorie. Yes indeed!
      Things—are graver. Why!—I'm lame for life—and I've a scar. The very look of things is
      changed...." He stared at her face and said: "You've hidden the looking-glass and you think I
      haven't noted it——"
"It keeps on healing," she interrupted. "And if it comes to that—where's my complexion?" She
      laughed. "These are just the superficial aspects of the case."
"Nothing ever heals completely," he said, answering her first sentence, "and nothing ever
      goes back to the exact place it held before. We are different, you sun-bitten,
      frost-bitten wife of mine."...
"Character is character," said Marjorie, coming back to her point. "Don't exaggerate
      conversion, dear. It's not a bit of good pretending we shan't fall away, both of us. Each in
      our own manner. We shall. We shall, old man. London is still a tempting and confusing place,
      and you can't alter people fundamentally, not even by half-freezing and half-starving them.
      You only alter people fundamentally by killing them and replacing them. I shall be extravagant
      again and forget again, try as I may, and you will work again and fall away again and forgive
      me again. You know——It's just as though we were each of us not one person, but a lot of
      persons, who sometimes meet and shout all together, and then disperse and forget and plot
      against each
       other...."
"Oh, things will happen again," said Trafford, in her pause. "But they will happen again
      with a difference—after this. With a difference. That's the good of it all.... We've found
      something here—that makes everything different.... We've found each other, too, dear
      wife."
She thought intently.
"I am afraid," she whispered.
"But what is there to be afraid of?"
"Myself."
She spoke after a little pause that seemed to hesitate. "At times I wish—oh,
      passionately!—that I could pray."
"Why don't you?"
"I don't believe enough—in that. I wish I did."
Trafford thought. "People are always so exacting about prayer," he said.
"Exacting."
"You want to pray—and you can't make terms for a thing you want. I used to think I could. I
      wanted God to come and demonstrate a bit.... It's no good, Madge.... If God chooses to be
      silent—you must pray to the silence. If he chooses to live in darkness, you must pray to the
      night...."
"Yes," said Marjorie, "I suppose one must."
She thought. "I suppose in the end one does," she said....

Mixed up with this entirely characteristic theology of theirs and their elaborate
      planning-out of a new life in London were other strands of thought. Queer memories of London
      and old times together would flash with a peculiar brightness across their
       contemplation of the infinities and the needs of mankind. Out of nowhere, quite
      disconnectedly, would come the human, finite: "Do you remember——?"
Two things particularly pressed into their minds. One was the thought of their children, and
      I do not care to tell how often in the day now they calculated the time in England, and tried
      to guess to a half mile or so where those young people might be and what they might be doing.
      "The shops are bright for Christmas now," said Marjorie. "This year Dick was to have had his
      first fireworks. I wonder if he did. I wonder if he burnt his dear little funny stumps of
      fingers. I hope not."
"Oh, just a little," said Trafford. "I remember how a squib made my glove smoulder and
      singed me, and how my mother kissed me for taking it like a man. It was the best part of the
      adventure."
"Dick shall burn his fingers when his mother's home to kiss him. But spare his fingers now,
      Dadda...."
The other topic was food.
It was only after they had been doing it for a week or so that they remarked how steadily
      they gravitated to reminiscences, suggestions, descriptions and long discussions of
      eatables—sound, solid eatables. They told over the particulars of dinners they had imagined
      altogether forgotten; neither hosts nor conversations seemed to matter now in the slightest
      degree, but every item in the menu had its place. They nearly quarrelled one day about
       hors-d'œuvre. Trafford wanted to dwell on them when Marjorie was eager for the
      soup.
"It's niggling with food," said Marjorie.
"Oh, but there's no reason," said Trafford, "why you shouldn't take a lot of
       hors-d'œuvre. Three or four sardines, and potato salad and a big piece of
       smoked salmon, and some of that Norwegian herring, and so on, and keep the
      olives by you to pick at. It's a beginning."
"It's—it's immoral," said Marjorie, "that's what I feel. If one needs a whet to eat, one
      shouldn't eat. The proper beginning of a dinner is soup—good, hot, rich soup. Thick
      soup—with things in it, vegetables and meat and things. Bits of oxtail."
"Not peas."
"No, not peas. Pea-soup is tiresome. I never knew anything one tired of so soon. I wish we
      hadn't relied on it so much."
"Thick soup's all very well," said Trafford, "but how about that clear stuff they give you
      in the little pavement restaurants in Paris. You know—Croûte-au-pot, with lovely
      great crusts and big leeks and lettuce leaves and so on! Tremendous aroma of onions, and
      beautiful little beads of fat! And being a clear soup, you see what there is.
      That's—interesting. Twenty-five centimes, Marjorie. Lord! I'd give a guinea a plate for it.
      I'd give five pounds for one of those jolly white-metal tureens full—you know, full,
      with little drops all over the outside of it, and the ladle sticking out under the lid."
"Have you ever tasted turtle soup?"
"Rather. They give it you in the City. The fat's—ripping. But they're rather precious with
      it, you know. For my own part, I don't think soup should be doled out. I always liked
      the soup we used to get at the Harts'; but then they never give you enough, you know—not
      nearly enough."
"About a tablespoonful," said Marjorie. "It's mocking an appetite."
"Still there's things to follow," said Trafford....
They discussed the proper order of a dinner very carefully. They decided that sorbets and
      ices were
       not only unwholesome, but nasty. "In London," said Trafford, "one's taste
      gets—vitiated."...
They weighed the merits of French cookery, modern international cookery, and produced
      alternatives. Trafford became very eloquent about old English food. "Dinners," said Trafford,
      "should be feasting, not the mere satisfaction of a necessity. There should
       be—amplitude. I remember a recipe for a pie; I think it was in one of those books
      that man Lucas used to compile. If I remember rightly, it began with: 'Take a swine and hew it
      into gobbets.' Gobbets! That's something like a beginning. It was a big pie with tiers and
      tiers of things, and it kept it up all the way in that key.... And then what could be better
      than prime British-fed roast beef, reddish, just a shade on the side of underdone, and not too
      finely cut. Mutton can't touch it."
"Beef is the best," she said.
"Then our English cold meat again. What can equal it? Such stuff as they give in a good
      country inn, a huge joint of beef—you cut from it yourself, you know as much as you like—with
      mustard, pickles, celery, a tankard of stout, let us say. Pressed beef, such as they'll give
      you at the Reform, too, that's good eating for a man. With chutney, and then old cheese to
      follow. And boiled beef, with little carrots and turnips and a dumpling or so. Eh?"
"Of course," said Marjorie, "one must do justice to a well-chosen turkey, a fat
      turkey."
"Or a good goose, for the matter of that—with honest, well-thought-out stuffing. I like the
      little sausages round the dish of a turkey, too; like cherubs they are, round the feet of a
      Madonna.... There's much to be said for sausage, Marjorie. It concentrates."
Sausage led to Germany. "I'm not one of those
       patriots," he was saying presently, "who run down other countries by way of
      glorifying their own. While I was in Germany I tasted many good things. There's their
      Leberwurst; it's never bad, and, at its best, it's splendid. It's only a fool would reproach
      Germany with sausage. Devonshire black-pudding, of course, is the master of any Blutwurst, but
      there's all those others on the German side, Frankfurter, big reddish sausage stuff again with
      great crystalline lumps of white fat. And how well they cook their rich hashes, and the thick
      gravies they make. Curious, how much better the cooking of Teutonic peoples is than the
      cooking of the South Europeans! It's as if one needed a colder climate to brace a cook to his
      business. The Frenchman and the Italian trifle and stimulate. It's as if they'd never met a
      hungry man. No German would have thought of soufflé. Ugh! it's vicious eating.
      There's much that's fine, though, in Austria and Hungary. I wish I had travelled in Hungary.
      Do you remember how once or twice we've lunched at that Viennese place in Regent Street, and
      how they've given us stuffed Paprika, eh?"
"That was a good place. I remember there was stewed beef once with a lot of barley—such
       good barley!"
"Every country has its glories. One talks of the cookery of northern countries and then
      suddenly one thinks of curry, with lots of rice."
"And lots of chicken!"
"And lots of hot curry powder, very hot. And look at America! Here's a people who
      haven't any of them been out of Europe for centuries, and yet they have as different a table
      as you could well imagine. There's a kind of fish, planked shad, that they cook on resinous
      wood—roast it, I suppose. It's substantial, like nothing else in the world. And how good,
       too, with turkey are sweet potatoes. Then they have such a multitude of cereal
      things; stuff like their buckwheat cakes, all swimming in golden syrup. And Indian corn,
      again!"
"Of course, corn is being anglicized. I've often given you corn—latterly, before we came
      away."
"That sort of separated grain—out of tins. Like chicken's food! It's not the real thing. You
      should eat corn on the cob—American fashion! It's fine. I had it when I was in the States. You
      know, you take it up in your hands by both ends—you've seen the cobs?—and gnaw."
The craving air of Labrador at a temperature of -20° Fahrenheit, and methodically stinted
      rations, make great changes in the outward qualities of the mind. "I'd like to do
      that," said Marjorie.
Her face flushed a little at a guilty thought, her eyes sparkled. She leant forward and
      spoke in a confidential undertone.
"I'd—I'd like to eat a mutton chop like that," said Marjorie.

One morning Marjorie broached something she had had on her mind for several days.
"Old man," she said, "I can't stand it any longer. I'm going to thaw my scissors and cut
      your hair.... And then you'll have to trim that beard of yours."
"You'll have to dig out that looking-glass."
"I know," said Marjorie. She looked at him. "You'll never be a pretty man again," she said.
      "But there's a sort of wild splendour.... And I love every inch and scrap of you...."
Their eyes met. "We're a thousand deeps now
       below the look of things," said Trafford. "We'd love each other minced."
She broke into that smiling laugh of hers. "Oh! it won't come to that," she said.
      "Trust my housekeeping!"
</div></body></text></TEI>